Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 8.1 Refunding Bond Authority

35-8.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Refunding Bond Authority Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds, declares, and observes that the:

State issued its general obligation bonds dated May 1, 1984, in the aggregate principal amount of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) pursuant to statutory authorities approved by the electorate of the state, and the state issued its general obligation bonds dated June 28, 1985, in the aggregate principal amount of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) pursuant to statutory authorities approved by the electorate of the state;

1984 and 1985 bonds bear interest at a rate in excess of current interest rates and the general assembly has determined that it would be in the best interests of the people of the state to obtain funds to pay, redeem, or retire the 1984 and 1985 bonds with bonds bearing a lower rate of interest;

Statutory authorities previously approved do not provide authorization for the issuance of general obligation refunding bonds of the state; and

General assembly desires to create an authority with the power to issue bonds to provide funds to loan to the state so that the state can pay, redeem, or retire the 1984 and 1985 bonds.

Furthermore, the general assembly desires to consolidate debt issuing authorities and create administrative savings as a result of such consolidations. To accomplish this desire, on July 1, 1997, the public building authority shall be eliminated as an entity and its functions, powers, rights, duties and liabilities shall be transferred to the authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 4.

35-8.1-3.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise indicated by the context, the following definitions shall apply for purposes of this chapter:

“Authority” shall mean this refunding bond authority created by §

35-8.1-4

;

“Board” means the board of directors of the authority as constituted by §

35-8.1-5

;

“Bond” or “bonds” shall include any bond or note and other instrument or form of indebtedness, whether or not certificated, that may lawfully be issued by the authority;

“Revenues” shall include all loan payments, charges, fees, moneys, profits, gifts, grants, contributions, appropriations, and all other income derived or to be derived by the authority under this chapter;

“State” shall mean the state of Rhode Island;

“1984 bonds” shall mean the state’s thirty million dollar ($30,000,000) general obligation bonds dated May 1, 1984; and

“1985 bonds” shall mean the state’s ninety million dollar ($90,000,000) general obligation bonds dated June 28, 1985.

The word “project” shall mean any public facility or public equipment which the authority is authorized to construct, improve, equip, furnish, maintain, acquire, install, or operate under the provisions of this chapter, to provide for the conduct of the executive, legislative, and judicial functions of government, and its various branches, departments, and agencies, at all levels including federal, state and municipal. The projects may include but need not be limited to judicial, administrative, educational, residential, rehabilitative, medical, correctional, recreational, transportation, public water supply system, and such other projects as the authority shall be requested to initiate to provide effective governmental, health, safety, and welfare services in the state, or by the federal government, or by any municipality or joint or regional agencies of the state or any combination thereof.

The word “person” shall mean and include natural persons, firms, associations, corporations, business trusts, partnerships, and public bodies.

The term “federal agency” shall mean and include the United States of America, and any department of, or corporation, agency, or instrumentality heretofore or hereafter created, designated or established by the United States of America.

The word “construction” shall mean and include acquisition and construction, and the term “to construct” shall mean and include to acquire and to construct, all in such manner as may be deemed desirable.

The term “improvement” shall mean and include extension, enlargement, and improvement, and the term “to improve” shall mean and include to extend, to enlarge, and to improve all in such manner as may be deemed desirable.

The term “public equipment” shall mean and include all tangible personal property, new or used, including without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all machinery, equipment, transportation equipment, maintenance equipment, construction equipment, sanitation equipment, and all other things and rights usually included within the term, including any and all interests in the property which are less than full title, such as leasehold interests, security interests, and every other interest or right, legal, or equitable.

The word “cost” as applied to any project to be constructed or acquired by the authority shall include the cost of acquisition or construction, and, if the project consists of public facilities, the cost of the acquisition of all land, rights of way, property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the authority for the construction, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which the buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction, and for one year after completion of construction, cost of estimates and of planning, engineering, and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the construction, administrative expenses and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the construction, the financing of the construction and the placing of the project in operation. The word “cost” as applied to any project which the authority may be authorized to acquire shall mean the amount of the purchase price of any public equipment, or if the project consists of public facilities, the amount of any condemnation award in connection with the acquisition of the project, and shall include the cost of acquiring all of the capital stock of the corporation owning the project, if such be the case, and the amount to be paid to discharge all of the obligations of the corporation in order to vest title to the project which may be determined by the authority to be necessary prior to the financing thereof, interest during the period of construction of the improvements and for one year thereafter, the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, franchises, and permits acquired, the cost of planning, engineering, and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the acquisition or improvement, administrative expenses, and such other expense as may be necessary or incident to the financing of the acquisition or improvement, and the placing of the project in operation by the authority. The word “cost” shall include the cost of purchase and installation of solar, wind, and renewable energy systems, which include solar thermal, solar electric, and wind energy systems that provide heating, cooling, hot water, or electricity to a building together with equipment for collection, storage, distribution, and control, including structural components of a building specifically designed to retain heat derived from solar energy.

The word “owner” shall mean and include all individuals, incorporated companies, copartnerships, societies, or associations and also municipalities, political subdivisions and all public agencies and instrumentalities having any title or interest in any property, rights, easements, or franchises authorized to be acquired under the provisions of this chapter.

The words “public facilities” shall mean and include any real property, lands, structures, buildings, facilities, or improvements, new or existing, and shall include all structures, parking facilities, landscaping and other appurtenances and facilities, including fixtures, furnishings, personalty, and equipment, incidental to the use of any building, the site thereof, and any easements, rights-of-way or other property rights appurtenant thereto or necessary or convenient in connection therewith.

The word “municipality” shall mean and include any city or town within the state now existing or hereafter created or any joint, mutual or regional entities, authorizing venture or undertaking involving two (2) or more such cities or towns.

The word “state” shall mean and include the state of Rhode Island, any office, department, board, commission, bureau, division, authority, public corporation, agency, or instrumentality thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 4.

35-8.1-4.
Creation.

There is hereby created and established a public corporation to be administered by the office of the general treasurer, having a distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of state government, to be known as the “Rhode Island refunding bond authority”. The authority is constituted as a public instrumentality to exercise public and essential governmental functions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 2.

35-8.1-5.
Governing board — Members — Vacancies — Officers — Quorum — Affirmative votes.

The authority shall be governed by a board which shall have seven (7) members, consisting of:

The general treasurer or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the general treasurer’s office, who shall serve as chairperson;

The director of administration or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the department of administration;

A representative of the budget office or his or her designee from within the budget office, who shall be appointed by the director of administration;

Two (2) public members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, one of whom shall serve an initial term of three (3) years; and one of whom shall serve an initial term of four (4) years. Thereafter, the members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified;

Two (2) public members appointed by the general treasurer, with the advice and consent of the senate: one of whom shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and one of whom shall serve an initial term of one year. Thereafter, the members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified; and

The gubernatorial and general treasurer appointees shall be persons qualified by training and experience in the fields of finance or banking. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state. Any member of the general public that was appointed by the governor prior to the effective date of this act [July 4, 2006] shall continue to serve until such time as a successor is appointed and qualified.

Public members of the authority shall be removable by the chair for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

Newly appointed and qualified public members shall, within six (6) months of their appointment, attend a training course that shall be developed and provided by the office of the general treasurer and shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 35-8.1, 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2 of the Rhode Island general laws; and the authority’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [July 4, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

In the event of vacancy occurring in the public membership, the appointing authority shall appoint a public member for the unexpired term. Any public member of the board shall be eligible for reappointment. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state.

Each member of the board, before entering upon any duties, shall swear or solemnly affirm to administer the duties of office faithfully and impartially, and that oath or affirmation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

The board shall elect one of their number to serve as both secretary and treasurer. Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of four (4) members shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 2.

35-8.1-6.
Compensation and expenses of members — Effect of membership on state office or employment.

The members of the authority shall serve without compensation, but the authority shall reimburse them for actual expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties. Notwithstanding any other law, an officer or employee of the state shall not be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his or her office or employment or any benefits thereof by reason of acceptance of the office of member of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-7.
Staff — Consultants — Rules.

The authority shall be staffed by the office of the general treasurer. The authority may employ such consultants, as it, in its discretion, deems necessary. For purposes of this chapter only, the authority may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 upon less than twenty (20) days’ notice and it may proceed upon any abbreviated notice and hearing to adopt an emergency rule if it finds an economic benefit to the state. The rules shall become effective immediately upon filing with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-8.
General powers.

To carry out the purposes of this chapter, the authority has the power to:

Sue and be sued;

Adopt and have an official seal and alter the seal at its pleasure;

Make and alter bylaws, rules, and regulations for the conduct of its affairs and business;

Maintain an office at such place or places within the state as it may determine;

Acquire, hold, use, and dispose of its revenue income, funds, and moneys;

Acquire, purchase, hold, and use any property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein necessary or desirable for carrying out the purposes of the authority, and to mortgage, lease, or sell any of the property; and (without limitation of the foregoing) to lease as lessee, any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein to lease as lessor to the federal government, the state, and any municipality any project of the authority, and to sell, transfer, and convey to any lessee or to any other person upon such terms and conditions and for such considerations as the authority shall determine.

Borrow money, issue its bonds, provide for and secure the payment thereof, and provide for the rights of the holders thereof, and purchase, hold, and dispose of any of its bonds;

Lend money for its purposes, invest and reinvest its funds, and, at its option, take and hold property, real or personal, as security for the payment of funds so loaned and invested, except that at no time will the authority take and hold property of the state as security for the payment of funds so loaned;

Accept, in furtherance of its purposes, appropriations, gifts, or grants of property, funds, money, materials, labor, supplies, or services from the United States of America or the state or any other state or agencies or departments thereof, or from any governmental unit or any person, firm, or corporation, and to carry out the terms or provisions or make agreements with respect to those appropriations, gifts, or grants, and to do any and all things necessary, useful, desirable, or convenient in connection with the procurement, acceptance, or disposition of those appropriations, gifts, or grants;

Do and perform any acts and things authorized by this chapter under, through, or by means of its officers or consultants or by contracts with any person, firm, or corporation;

Make, enter into, and enforce all contracts or agreements necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of the authority or pertaining to any loan to the state or to the performance of its duties and execution or carrying out of any of its powers under this chapter;

Purchase any bond or interest rate insurance and establish such credit or liquidity enhancement arrangements with financial institutions as the authority shall deem advisable;

Invest any funds or moneys of the authority in the same manner as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the state or held in the state treasury; and

Do all acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter;

Acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and to construct, improve, equip, furnish, maintain, repair, and operate projects, and to establish rules and regulations for the use of any project;

Rent such space in such public facilities as from time to time may not be needed by any governmental entity to any person for such other purposes as the authority may determine and upon such terms and in such manner as the authority may determine;

Employ, in its discretion, planning, architectural, or engineering consultants, attorneys, accountants, construction, and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other officers, employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;

Fix and revise from time to time, subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to charge and collect fees, rentals, and other charges for the use of the facilities of, or for the services rendered by, the authority or projects thereof, at rates to be determined by the authority, for the purpose of providing for the payment of the expenses of the authority, the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair, equipping, furnishing, maintenance, and operation of its facilities and properties, the payment of the principal of and interest on its obligations, and to fulfill the terms and provisions of any agreements made with the purchasers or holders of any obligations;

Without limitation of the foregoing, to borrow money from, to receive, and accept grants for or in aid of construction or acquisition of projects authorized under this chapter from, and to enter into contracts, leases, or other transactions with, any federal agency; and to receive and accept from the state or any municipality, and from any other source, aid or contributions of either money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which the grants and contributions may be made;

Combine for financing purposes any two (2) or more projects authorized to be acquired or constructed under the provisions of this chapter;

Be a promoter, partner, member, owner, associate, or manager of any partnership, condominium, or other enterprise or venture;

Acquire in the name of the authority by purchase or otherwise, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the rights of condemnation in the manner hereinafter provided, such public or private lands, including public parks, playgrounds, or reservations, or parts thereof or rights therein, rights of way, property, rights, easements, and interests as it may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, that all public property damaged in carrying out the powers granted by this chapter shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable.

Issue bonds and notes of the type and for those projects and for those purposes specified in any Joint Resolution of the general assembly enacted by the Rhode Island house of representatives and the Rhode Island senate pursuant to section 18 of title 35 of the general laws entitled “Rhode Island Public Corporation Debt Management Act,” which project and purposes specified in such Joint Resolution shall constitute a “project” within the meaning of this chapter; and

To enter into such agreements, to deliver such instruments, and to take such other actions as it shall deem necessary or desirable to effectuate the financing of such project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 4, § 5.

35-8.1-8.1.
Transfer of functions, powers, rights, duties, and liabilities of the public buildings authority.

Upon the passage of this article there are hereby transferred to the authority all the functions, powers, rights, duties, liabilities, property and resources of the public buildings authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 5.

35-8.1-8.2.
Acquisition and construction of projects — Lease or sale — Conveyance to authority — Request for project.

In order to benefit the people of the state and to provide for their general health and welfare and to maintain the high standards of public facilities and public equipment within the state the authority is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire and construct public facilities and to acquire public equipment; to maintain, repair and operate the same; and with the consent of both the governor and the general assembly to issue revenue bonds of the authority, payable solely from revenues derived from leasing of the projects, to finance the same. Development of the projects may be initiated by the authority only upon request of the proper agency of the federal government, or of the legislative body of the municipality seeking the project, or of both the general assembly and the governor in the case of the state, the director of administration with the approval of the governor being hereby authorized to enter into a contract of lease with the authority for the leasing of such projects upon such terms and conditions as shall be agreed to by the director of administration and the authority; and, in the case of public facilities (except those public facilities to be used in connection with projects to provide judicial complexes, administrative offices, educational facilities and warehouse facilities), shall require, prior to the issuance of such revenue bonds, approval by resolution of the legislative body of the municipality in which they are proposed to be located.

Without limiting the generality of the foregoing the authority is expressly empowered to lease or sell a project or any part thereof to the state or to any municipality. Any such lease by the authority to the state or any municipality may be for such period, upon such terms and conditions, with or without an option to purchase, as the authority may determine.

The provisions of any other laws or ordinances, general, special or local, or of any rule or regulation of the state or any municipality, restricting or regulating in any manner the power of the state or any municipality to lease (as lessee or lessor) or sell property, real, personal or mixed, shall not apply to leases and sales made with the authority pursuant to this chapter.

The state and any municipality, notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, are hereby authorized and empowered to lease, lend, grant or convey to the authority, at its request upon such terms and conditions as the proper authorities of the state and any such municipality may deem reasonable and fair and without the necessity for any advertisement, order of court or other action or formality, other than the regular and formal action of the authorities concerned, any real property or personal property which may be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purpose of the authority, including public roads and other real property already devoted to public use; and subject to the aforesaid, the state hereby consents to the use of all lands owned by it, including lands lying under water, which are deemed by the authority to be necessary for the construction or operation of any project.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered to contract for the acquisition of any of its projects or portions thereof by the federal government; and to contract with any state, federal, or municipal agencies for the performance of any services essential or convenient to its purposes under this chapter.

Any request by the legislative body of a municipality seeking a project shall be in the form of a resolution adopted by a unanimous vote of such body, or, in the case of projects requested by the legislative bodies of two or more cities or towns comprising a joint or regional undertaking, by a unanimous vote of the legislative body of each such city or town participating in such undertaking.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 5.

35-8.1-8.3.
Eminent domain proceedings.

The authority shall have the right to acquire any land, or any interest therein, by the exercise of the power of eminent domain, whenever it shall be determined by the authority that the acquisition of the land, or interest, is necessary for the construction or the operation of any project.

The necessity for an acquisition shall be conclusively presumed upon the adoption by the authority of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the land, or interest therein, described in the resolution is necessary for the construction or operation. Within six (6) months thereafter the authority shall cause to be filed in the land evidence records of the city or town in which the land is located, a copy of the resolution of the authority, together with a plat of the land, or interest therein described, and a statement, signed by the chairperson of the authority, that the lands, or interest therein, are taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Thereupon the authority shall file in the superior court in and for the county in which the land, or interest therein lies, a statement of the sum of money estimated by the authority to be just compensation for the land taken.

Upon the filing of the copy of the resolution, plat, and statement in the land evidence records of the city or town, the filing in the superior court, of the statement, and the depositing in the superior court, to the use of the persons entitled thereto, of such sum as the court shall determine to be amply sufficient to satisfy the claims of all persons interested in the land (and the court may, in its discretion, take evidence on the question to determine the sum to be deposited), title to the land, or interest therein, shall vest in the authority in fee simple absolute and the authority thereupon may take possession of the land, or interest therein.

No sum so paid into the court shall be charged with clerk’s fees of any nature. After the filing of the copy, plat, and statement, notice of the taking of the land, or interest therein, shall be served upon the owners of and persons having an estate in and interested in the land by the sheriff or his or her deputies of the county in which the land, or interest therein, lies, leaving a true and attested copy of the description and statement with each of the persons personally, or at their last and usual place of abode in this state with some person living there, and in the case any of the persons are absent from this state and have no last and usual place of abode therein occupied by any person, the copy shall be left with the persons, if any, in charge of or having possession of the land, or interest therein, taken of the absent persons if the same are known to the officer; and after the filing of the resolution, plat, and statement, the secretary of the authority shall cause a copy of the resolution and statement to be published in some newspaper published or having general circulation in the county where the land, or interest therein, may be located, at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks. If any person shall agree with the authority for the price of the land, or interest therein, so taken, the court upon the application of the parties in interest, may order that the sum agreed upon be paid forthwith from the money deposited, as the just compensation to be awarded in the proceeding.

Any owner of or persons entitled to any estate in or interested in any part of the land, or interest therein, so taken, who cannot agree with the authority for the price of the land, or interest therein, so taken in which he or she is interested as aforesaid, may, within three (3) months after personal notice of the taking, or, if he or she have no personal notice, may within one year from the first publication of the copy of the resolution and statement, apply by petition to the superior court in and for the county in which the land, or interest therein, lies, setting forth the taking of his or her land or interest therein, and praying for an assessment of damages by a jury. Upon the filing of the petition the court shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the pendency thereof to be given to the authority by serving the chairperson or vice chairperson of the authority with a certified copy thereof, and may proceed after notice to the trial thereof; and the trial shall determine all questions of fact relating to the value of the land, or interest therein, and the amount thereof, and judgment shall be entered upon the verdict of the jury and execution shall be issued therefor against the money so deposited in court and in default thereof against any other property of the authority. In case two (2) or more conflicting petitioners make claim to the same land, or to any interests therein, or to different interests in the same parcel of land, the court upon motion shall consolidate their several petitions for trial at the same time by the same jury, and may frame all necessary issues for the trial thereof; and all proceedings taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall take precedence over all other civil matters then pending before the court, or if the superior court in and for the county in which the land, or interest therein, lies, be not in session in the county, then the trial may be heard in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol.

If any lands, or interests therein, in which any minor or other person not capable in law to act in his or her own behalf is interested, are taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter, the superior court, upon the filing therein of any petition by or in behalf of the minor or other person, may appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor or other person, and the guardian may appear and be heard in behalf of the minor or other person; and the guardian may also, with the advice and consent of the superior court and upon the terms as said superior court may prescribe, release to the authority all claims for damages for the lands of the minor or other person or for any interests therein. Any lawfully appointed, qualified, and acting guardian or other fiduciary of the estate of any minor or other person, with the approval of the court of probate within this state having jurisdiction to authorize the sale of lands and properties within this state of any minor or other person, may, before the filing of any petition, agree with the authority upon the amount of damages suffered by the minor or other person by any taking of his or her lands or of his or her interests in any lands, and may, upon receiving the amount, release to the authority all claims of damages of the minor or other person for such taking.

Whenever, from time to time the authority has satisfied the court that the amount deposited with the court is greater than is amply sufficient to satisfy the claims of all persons interested in the land, the court may order that the amount of any excess including any interest or increment on any sums so deposited shall be repaid to the authority. Whenever the authority has satisfied the court that the claims of all persons interested in the land taken have been satisfied, the unexpended balance, including any interest of increment on any sums so deposited, shall be paid forthwith to the authority.

In any proceedings for the assessment of compensation and damages for land or interest therein taken or to be taken by eminent domain by the authority the following provisions shall be applicable:

At any time during the pendency of the action or proceeding, the authority or an owner may apply to the court for an order directing an owner or the authority, as the case may be, to show cause why further proceedings should not be expedited, and the court may upon an application make an order requiring that the hearings proceed and that any other steps be taken with all possible expedition.

If any of the land, or interest therein, is devoted to a public use, it may, nevertheless, be acquired, and the taking shall be effective provided that no land, or interest therein, belonging to a public utility corporation may be acquired without the approval of the public utilities administrator or other officer or tribunal having regulatory power over the corporation. Any land, or interest therein, already acquired by the authority may, nevertheless be included within the taking for the purpose of acquiring any outstanding interests in the land.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 24.

35-8.1-8.4.
Eminent domain — Standards.

In addition to all of the proceedings and requirements under §

35-8.1-8.3

, the authority shall further be required to follow the same statutory proceedings for the taking of land as required of state agencies when the agencies take land under the authority granted by chapter 6 of title 37.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 5.

35-8.1-8.5.
Use of projects.

The use of the facilities of the authority and the operation of its business shall be subject to the rules and regulations from time to time adopted by the authority; provided, however, that the authority shall not be authorized to do anything which will impair the security of the holders of the obligations of the authority or violate any agreements with them or for their benefit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 5.

35-8.1-8.6.
Transfer to governmental body.

When all bonds issued under the provisions of the chapter for each specific project and the interest thereon shall have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of all the bonds and the interest thereon to the maturity thereof shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders, that specific project financed under the provisions of this chapter may be transferred to the governmental body leasing the project on such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the authority shall determine. If the authority shall be dissolved all funds of the authority not required for the payment of bonds shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state and all property belonging to the authority shall be vested in the state and delivered to it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 5.

35-8.1-9.
Supplementary powers.

In addition to any other powers granted in this chapter, the authority has the power to:

Conduct examinations and hearings and hear testimony and take proof, under oath or affirmation, at public or private hearings, on any matter material for its information and necessary to carry out the terms of this chapter;

Issue subpoenas, necessary to carry out the terms of this chapter, requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers pertinent to any hearing before the authority, or before one or more of the members of the authority appointed by it to conduct the hearing; and

Apply to any court, having territorial jurisdiction of the offense, to have punished for contempt any witness who refuses to obey a subpoena, or who refuses to be sworn or affirmed to testify, or who is guilty of any contempt after summons to appear.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-10.
Annual report, audit, and debt service needs certification.

In the month of January, the authority shall make an annual report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate and the secretary of state. The report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year, a summary of meetings or hearings held, meeting minutes if requested, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to subsection

35-8.1-5(a)

; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s website as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

of the Rhode Island general laws. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 2.

35-8.1-11.
Loan to state authorized — Repayment subject to appropriation.

The authority may lend money to the state, upon the request of the governor, by entering into a loan and trust agreement. The governor is authorized to enter into a loan and trust agreement with the authority for the loaning of money to the state upon such terms and conditions as shall be agreed upon by the governor and the authority. Upon the loaning and delivery of money to the state, the state shall be deemed to have agreed to make certain loan payments in order to provide revenues to the authority. Notwithstanding anything in this chapter or any loan and trust agreement to the contrary, the amounts required to be paid by the state shall be subject to and dependent upon appropriations being made from time to time by the general assembly for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.